Utah statutes.
72-8-104.   Funding priorities by county and municipality officials --
Factors.
(1)  A county or municipality may use a portion of their B and C road funds
for pedestrian safety devices under this part.
(2)  The county legislative body of the counties and the governing officials
of participating municipalities may establish funding priorities relating to
construction of curbs, gutters, sidewalks, or other pedestrian safety
construction, with funds permitted to be expended by this part, based on
factors including, but not limited to:
(a)  existing useable rights-of-way;
(b) vehicle-pedestrian accident experience;
(c)  average daily vehicle traffic;
(d)  average daily pedestrian traffic;
(e)  average daily school age pedestrian traffic; and
(f)  speed of vehicle traffic.
(3)  All construction performed under this part shall be barrier free to
wheelchairs at crosswalks and intersections.
